Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.141

RCW 19.28.101 inapplicable in certain cities and towns, electricity supply agency service areas, and rights-of-way of state highways.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the provisions of RCW 19.28.101 shall not apply:

(a) Within the corporate limits of any incorporated city or town which has heretofore adopted and enforced or subsequently adopts and enforces an ordinance requiring an equal, higher or better standard of construction and of materials, devices, appliances and equipment than is required by this chapter.

(b) Within the service area of an electricity supply agency owned and operated by a city or town which is supplying electricity and enforcing a standard of construction and materials outside its corporate limits [on] July 1, 1963. The city, town, or agency shall enforce by inspection within its service area outside its corporate limits the same standards of construction and of materials, devices, appliances and equipment as are enforced by the department of labor and industries under this chapter. Fees charged in connection with such enforcement shall not exceed those established in RCW 19.28.101.

(c) Within the rights-of-way of state highways, provided the state department of transportation maintains and enforces an equal, higher or better standard of construction and of materials, devices, appliances and equipment than is required by RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361.

(2) A city, town, or electrical supply agency is permitted, but not required, to enforce the same permitting and inspection standards applicable to basic electrical work as are enforced by the department of labor and industries.

[ 2003 c 399 s 202; 2001 c 211 s 9; 1986 c 156 s 12; 1967 ex.s. c 97 s 1; 1963 c 207 s 4; 1959 c 325 s 3. Formerly RCW 19.28.360.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2003 c 399: See note following RCW 19.28.006.

Effective date—1963 c 207: See RCW 19.28.910.